lexc/adj/enhuadjmely.lexc
LEXICON Possmelya
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammelya;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Fammelya;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammelya;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Fammelya;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammelya;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammelya;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammelya;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Fammelya;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammelya;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammelya;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE22§im   Fammelya;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammelya;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE22§id   Fammelya;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammelya;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE22§i   Fammelya;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammelya;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE22§ink   Fammelya;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammelya;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammelya;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammelya;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE22§ik   Fammelya;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammelya1;

LEXICON Possmmelya
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammelya;   ! m
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m        Genmelya;  ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammelya;   ! d
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d        Genmelya;  ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammelya;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammelya;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammelya;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k Genmelya;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammelya;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammelya;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammelya;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammelya;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammelya;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammelya;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammelya;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammelya;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammelya;

LEXICON Plurmmelya
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmelya;
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmelya;
                            Genmelya1;

LEXICON Plurmelya
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoemely§k    Genmelya; 
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmelya;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmelya;
                            Genmelya;
        
LEXICON Fammelya
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmelya;
                       Genmelya;
LEXICON Fammelya1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmelya;
                       Genmelya1;

LEXICON Genmelya
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemelya;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemelya;
                       Casemelya;
LEXICON Genmelya1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemelya;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemelya;
                       Casemelya1;
 
LEXICON Casemelya
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig

LEXICON Casemelya1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
                          Ikmely;

! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdjkorai
0:^+cMid§oeoebbmely§bb Tocase1korai;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasekorai;

Lexicon Tocase1korai
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possmelykorai;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurmelykorai;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Fammelykorai;

Lexicon Tocasekorai
[stem]+Adj:0     Possmelykorai;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurmelykorai;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fammelykorai;

LEXICON Possmelykorai
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammelykorai;   ! m
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m        Genmelykorai;  ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammelykorai;   ! d
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d        Genmelykorai;  ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammelykorai;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammelykorai;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammelykorai;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k Genmelykorai;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammelykorai;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammelykorai;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammelykorai;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammelykorai;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammelykorai;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammelykorai;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammelykorai;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammelykorai;

LEXICON Plurmelykorai
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmelykorai;
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmelykorai;
                            Genmelykorai;

LEXICON Fammelykorai
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmelykorai;
                       Genmelykorai;

LEXICON Genmelykorai
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemelykorai;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemelykorai;
                       Casemelykorai;

LEXICON Adj
korai AddAdjkorai;
